Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.153

Promotional hosting expenditures—Rules.

Agricultural commodity commissions shall adopt rules governing promotional hosting expenditures by commodity commission employees, agents, or commission members under RCW 15.04.200.

[ 2002 c 313 s 59.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.